District of Columbia statutes.
16-2306

Service of summons and petition.

(a)

When a petition is filed, the Division shall set a time for initial appearance and shall direct the issuance of summonses. If delinquency or need of supervision is alleged, a summons, together with a copy of the petition, shall be served upon the child and upon his spouse (if any) and his parent, guardian, or other custodian. If neglect is alleged, the summons, together with a copy of the petition, shall be served on the parent, guardian, or other custodian of the child named in the petition. Where appropriate to the proper disposition of the case, the Division may direct service of summonses upon other persons. A summons issued pursuant to this section shall advise the parties of the right to counsel as provided in section 16-2304.

(b)

Upon request of the Corporation Counsel, the Division may endorse upon the summons an order directing the parent, guardian, or other custodian of the child to appear personally at the hearing and directing the person having physical custody or control of the child to bring the child to the hearing.

(c)

If it appears, from information presented to the Division, that there are grounds to take the child into custody as provided in section 16-2309, or that the child may leave or be removed from the jurisdiction of the Superior Court or will not be brought to the hearing, notwithstanding service of the summons, the Division may endorse upon the summons an order that the officer serving summons shall at once take the child into custody. If the child is taken into custody under this section, the provisions of sections 16-2309 to 16-2312 shall apply.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 588, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 527, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
This section is referenced in § 16-2307, § 16-2309, § 16-2327, and § 16-4603.09.
1981 Ed., § 16-2306.
1973 Ed., § 16-2306.